Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.190

Special inquiry judge—Direction to public attorney for proceedings in another county—Procedure.

Upon petition of a public attorney to the special inquiry judge that there is reason to suspect that there exists evidence of crime and corruption in another county, and with the concurrence of the special inquiry judge and prosecuting attorney of the other county, the special inquiry judge may direct the public attorney to attend and participate in special inquiry judge proceedings in the other county held to inquire into crime and corruption which relates to crime or corruption under investigation in the initiating county. The proceedings of such special inquiry judge may be transcribed, certified and filed in the county of the public attorney's jurisdiction at the expense of that county.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 19.]